California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78862.

The vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute an act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78863.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78864.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend meetings of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78865.

No member or alternate member of the commission, or member of a committee established by the commission who is not a member of the commission, shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission and any alternate member serving in place of his or her member, except ex officio members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is not a member of the commission, shall receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission, and may receive an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This amount shall be paid for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78866.

All funds received by the assessments levied pursuant to this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks that the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78867.

(a) The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission.

(b) No member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission or for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, except for their own individual act of dishonesty or crime. Liability is several and not joint, and no member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission is liable individually for the default, act, or omission of any other member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [78881. - 78882.]

78881.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Elect a chairperson and other officers as it may deem advisable, and delegate duties as may be advisable.

(b) Adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary rules, procedures, and orders for the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties, including rules of procedure for appeals from any rule, procedure, or order of the commission.

(c) Administer and enforce this chapter, and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to or in connection with or deemed reasonably necessary, proper, or advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Employ or retain a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including private legal counsel of its choice, necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the direction of the commission.

(e) Establish offices and incur expenses, and enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance or receipt of assessments as may be necessary, at the discretion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance if its duties.

(f) Maintain accurate books, records, and accounts of all its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all persons subject to this chapter, a copy of which shall also be submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(g) Present facts to, and negotiate with, local, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters affecting the winegrape, wine, and winegrape products industries.

(h) Appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission.

(i) Promote the sale of winegrapes, wine, and winegrape products by advertising and other similar means for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate and foreign markets for winegrapes, assess and address the impact of local, state, federal and foreign regulations on the winegrape products industries, and seek the elimination of tariff and nontariff trade barriers.

(j) Educate and instruct the consuming public with respect to winegrapes, wine, and winegrape products, including, but not limited to, the uses, healthful properties and dietetic value of these commodities, and the environmental protection and conservation issues relating to the production of winegrapes.

(k) Educate and instruct the wholesale, food service, and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and marketing of winegrapes, wine, and winegrape products, arrange for the performance of merchandising work providing display and other promotional materials, conduct market surveys and analysis, assist local, state, and federal agencies in negotiating with foreign governments regarding issues affecting market access, including, but not limited to, resolving phytosanitary issues, developing shipping protocols, limiting chemical residues, and addressing packaging, labeling, and other issues raised by countries imposing trade barriers on the import of agricultural products into their markets, and undertake any other similar activities that the commission may determine appropriate for the maintenance and expansion of present markets and the creation of new and larger markets for winegrapes, wine, and winegrape products.

(l) Conduct, and contract with others to conduct, scientific and other research, including the study, analysis, dissemination and accumulation of information obtained from research or elsewhere respecting the production, cultural practices, nutritional and dietetic value, processing, storage, refrigeration, inspection, transportation, marketing and distribution of winegrapes, wine, and winegrape products.

(m) Accept contributions of private, local, state, or federal funds, and make contributions of commission funds, or match contributions, to other persons or to local, state, or federal agencies for purposes of promoting, enhancing and maintaining the Mendocino County winegrape, wine, and winegrape products industries.

(n) Cooperate with governmental or private entities in the resolution of emergencies arising in the industry and impacting the health and safety of the public or the continued stability of the industry.

(o) Collect information, including, but not limited to, industry crop statistics, and publish and distribute without charge, a bulletin or other communication to persons subject to this chapter.

(p) Establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(q) Establish an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made for the payment of employees.

(r) Submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(s) Keep confidential and not disclose, except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter, all information deemed proprietary or trade secret by the commission. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is required to ensure that producer and vintner proprietary and trade secret information shall not be disclosed. The commission shall establish procedures to provide producers and vintners access to communicate with other producers and vintners regarding noncommercial matters affecting the commission so long as the access does not directly or indirectly release proprietary or trade secret information in the possession of the commission.

(t) Investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(u) Administer any program that is engaged in activities authorized by this chapter upon the request of an authorized agent of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78882.

(a) The commission may collect and disseminate to any and all interested parties, vintner market price information based on sales that have occurred in order to prevent unfair trade practices that are detrimental to the Mendocino County winegrape, wine, and winegrape products industries, including, but not limited to, deception and misinformation.

(b) The information reported under this section shall be kept confidential and shall not be made public under any circumstances. Only information that gives industry totals, averages, and other similar data in aggregate, nonindividualized form may be disclosed by the commission. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is required to ensure that vintner proprietary information shall not be disclosed.

(c) The procedure for the collection and dissemination of information pursuant to this section shall be concurred in by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Referendum on Implementation of this Chapter [78901. - 78909.]

78901.

(a) Within 90 days of the effective date of this chapter, the secretary shall establish a list of producers and vintners in Mendocino County eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary may require that all producers and vintners in Mendocino County submit their names and mailing addresses.

(b) The secretary may also require that the information provided include the quantity of winegrapes, wine, or winegrape products produced by each producer and vintner or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 78903. The request for information shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the secretary within 10 days following the receipt of the request.

(c) Any producer or vintner in Mendocino County whose name does not appear on the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer or vintner. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from paying assessments, and does not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers and vintners on the lists in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary if all expenses associated with those contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78903.

In determining whether this chapter is approved by producers, the secretary shall find both of the following:

(a) That at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting market a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding market season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) That at least 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting either acquired or processed their own production, or a combination thereof, that represents a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting either acquired or processed their own production, or a combination thereof, that represents 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78904.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78905.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78906.

The secretary shall certify and give notice of a favorable vote to all producers and vintners whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary if he or she finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this chapter. The secretary shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative if he or she finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78907.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall call meetings of producers and vintners in Mendocino County for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission, or in the alternative, may conduct the elections by mail ballot. All producers and vintners on the secretary’s list shall be given written notice of the election meetings at least 15 days prior to the meeting date, or reasonable notice of elections by mail ballot and a reasonable time period in which to return ballots. In any election of producer and vintner members to the commission, only producers who are not also vintners may vote for producer members and alternate members, and only vintners may vote for vintner members and alternate members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78908.

Subsequent to the first members and alternate members elected to the commission, persons to be elected and appointed to the commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78909.

(a) Prior to the implementation referendum conducted by the secretary, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary producer and vintner lists and conducting the referendum.

(b) Any funds remaining after paying expenses shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) The commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article and for any legal or other professional fees and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments [78921. - 78928.]

78921.

Prior to the beginning of each marketing season, or as soon as possible thereafter, the commission shall establish assessment rates for the marketing season, as follows:

(a) An annual assessment on producers of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), as determined by the commission, based on the number of tons of winegrapes marketed during the preceding marketing season.

(b) In addition, producers shall pay an assessment not less than one dollar ($1) and not greater than twelve dollars ($12) per ton of winegrapes marketed by producers. In the discretion of the commission, the producer assessment may be established as a percent of the gross dollar value received by producers for winegrapes rather than on a per ton basis. The assessment shall be established on a sliding scale that decreases the assessment by two dollars ($2) per ton, or the percentage equivalent if the assessment is a percent of gross dollar value, for every 500 tons of winegrapes marketed by producers in excess of 1000 tons.

(c) An annual assessment on vintners of not less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), as determined by the commission, based on the number of tons of winegrapes processed and marketed by vintners during the preceding marketing season.

(d) In addition, vintners shall pay an assessment not less than one dollar ($1) and not greater than twelve dollars ($12) per ton of winegrapes processed by vintners for which an assessment has not already been paid by a producer. The assessment shall be established on a sliding scale that decreases the assessment by two dollars ($2) per ton for every 500 tons of winegrapes processed by vintners in excess of 1000 tons.

 (e) An assessment greater than the amount provided for in this section may not be charged unless and until a greater amount is approved by a majority of the commission and by eligible producers and vintners pursuant to the referendum procedures specified in Section 78903.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 124, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

78923.

This chapter shall not apply to winegrapes produced for a producer’s home or ornamental use, or processed for a vintner’s home use. A producer growing winegrapes commercially on three acres or less shall be exempted from the base assessment in subdivision (a) of Section 78921. Any producer or vintner requesting an exemption from the payment of assessments shall provide an affidavit approved by the commission containing information required by the commission. The commission shall review the affidavit, conduct any additional investigation it deems appropriate, and approve or deny the exemption. If granted, the exemption shall be valid for one marketing season and a new affidavit shall be filed and approved prior to each marketing season in order to retain an exemption from this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 124, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

78924.

(a) Every producer and vintner shall keep complete and accurate records of winegrapes produced, processed, and marketed, including, but not limited to, the number of tons of winegrapes delivered to or received by vintners, whether within or outside of Mendocino County, the names of the producers from which vintners receive winegrapes, and records related to the sale of winegrapes, wine, or winegrape products. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved by producers and vintners for a period of five years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(b) For purposes of this section and for any other section of this chapter that relates to recordkeeping or the collection and remittance of assessments from producers, including any section dealing with confidentiality of information received from vintners, the term “vintner” shall include persons in this state outside Mendocino County who otherwise meet the definition of vintner in Section 78839. Those persons shall not be required to pay the vintner assessment established by the commission, but shall collect and remit assessments and reports regarding winegrapes received that were produced in Mendocino County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78925.

(a) All proprietary and trade secret information obtained by the commission from producers and vintners shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is required to ensure that producer and vintner proprietary and trade secret information shall not be disclosed.

(b) In addition, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, all proprietary or trade secret information developed or gathered pursuant to this chapter by the commission, or by the department on behalf of the commission, from
 any source is confidential, shall not be considered a public record as that term is defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code, and shall not be disclosed by the commission or the secretary except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(c) Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission, or aggregate sales and inventory information, and other information that give only totals, but excludes individual information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(d) The commission shall determine whether information is proprietary or trade secret and not subject to disclosure. If the commission denies a request
 for disclosure of this information, the commission shall provide written justification for its decision to the person requesting the information who may appeal the decision of the commission to the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 133.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

78926.

(a) Any assessment levied by the commission, pursuant to this chapter, is a personal debt of every person so assessed and is due and payable in the time and manner prescribed by the commission. Failure of a vintner to collect the assessment from a producer shall not exempt the vintner from liability nor relieve the producer of the obligation to pay the assessment.

(b) When the producer or vintner is a corporation, general or limited partnership, or trust, all of the directors and officers of the corporation, all of the members and managers of the limited liability company, all of the general and limited partners in the partnership, and all of the trustees of the trust, in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including, but not limited to, failing to pay assessments or file required reports, shall also include identical liability upon each director and officer of the corporation, each member and manager of the limited liability company, each general and limited partner in the partnership, and each trustee of the trust. Title to the assessments, shall pass immediately to the commission. When collecting and remitting producer assessments, vintners shall hold the assessments in trust for the benefit of the commission until remitted in the time and manner specified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78927.

Any person who fails to file a return, or remit or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due, and in addition, 1.5 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78928.

In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to submit records or pay an assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount, and for a period of time, specified by the commission as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [78941. - 78945.]

78941.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission or to in any way to affect the delivery, receipt, processing, or marketing of winegrapes with the intent to avoid payment of assessments.

(b) Fail to render or furnish a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) When engaged in the production, delivery, processing, marketing, or other activities related to winegrapes, wine, or winegrape products, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission, or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the name and address of the persons to whom winegrapes were delivered or from whom winegrapes have been received, and the quantity delivered.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be maintained under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78942.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its action or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78943.

(a) The commission may commence civil action and use all remedies provided in law or equity for the enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the collection of assessments, penalties, and interest, and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the procedures adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other procedure of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 484.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding winegrapes, wine, or winegrape products until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment.

(d) Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 79843 by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

78944.

Any action by the commission for any violation of this chapter shall be commenced within three years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced within three years from the date of the act of which the person complains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78945.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reapproval of Chapter [78961. - 78965.]

78961.

Every five years, commencing with the 2011-2012 marketing season, the secretary shall hold a hearing to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds, after the hearing, that a substantial question exists among eligible persons regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter to a reapproval referendum. If a reapproval referendum is required, the operation of this chapter shall continue in effect if the secretary finds that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing this chapter and a majority of the eligible vintners voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing this chapter. In finding whether the commission is continued pursuant to this article, the vote of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association that is authorized by its member to so vote, shall be considered to be the approval or rejection by the individual members thereof, or the individual stockholders therein. No bond or security shall be required for any referendum required by this chapter however, this shall not apply to advance deposit of funds required by the department to cover the actual cost of a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78962.

If the secretary finds, after conducting a hearing pursuant to Section 78961, that no substantial question exists, or that a favorable vote has been given after a referendum, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given after a referendum vote, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the then current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the committee shall be wound up and concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 78964.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78963.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purpose, the commission may recommend to the secretary that this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the then current marketing season.

(b) Alternatively, the secretary may be petitioned to suspend this chapter. The petition must be signed by 2 percent of the producers, by number, who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season and 20 percent of the vintners, by number, who acquired not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season.

(c) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation to suspend this chapter from the commission, and may, after holding a hearing on the petition to suspend this chapter, hold a referendum among the producers and vintners to determine if the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(d) The secretary shall establish a referendum period that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers and 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the lists established by the secretary participate in the referendum, the secretary shall suspend this chapter if he or she finds either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers and vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, the producers so voting marketed the majority of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who participated in the referendum, and the vintners so voting acquired the majority of the total quantity of winegrapes acquired in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who participated in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers and vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum, and the vintners so voting acquired 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes acquired in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78964.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operation of the commission shall be wound up and concluded and all moneys held by the commission not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the operations of the committee shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts returnable are such that it would be impractical or administratively burdensome to calculate and refund the moneys to the assessment payers, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid to another program conducted or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78965.

Upon suspension of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and vintners affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 25. Sea Urchins [79000. - 79145.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations and General Provisions [79000. - 79009.]

79000.

The sea urchin fishery includes both divers and processors working together to provide a sustainable sea urchin resource and to ensure a reliable supply of quality seafood product for domestic consumption and export, thereby maintaining strong local coastal economies, fair levels of income to the thousands of persons engaged directly and indirectly in commercial fishing enterprises, and historically significant cultural and community resources of California’s coast.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 973, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

79001.

The production and marketing of seafood, including sea urchin, constitute an important industry of this state that provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 973, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

79002.
